pl: Kompatybilny typ gwintu butelki: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Wąska szyjka; Standardowa szyjka; Szeroka szyjka; Inna
ja: 互換性のある哺乳瓶の口: 42 mm; 48.5 mm; 狭口; 標準口; 広口; その他
sk-SK: Kompatibilný otvor fľaše: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Úzke hrdlo; Štandardné hrdlo; Široké hrdlo; Iné
ro-RO: Gura de sticlă compatibilă: 42 mm; 48.5 mm; Gură îngustă; Gură standard; Gură largă; Altele
hr-HR: Kompatibilno usta boce: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Usko grlo; Standardno grlo; Široko grlo; Ostalo
zh-TW: 相容瓶口: 42 公釐; 48.5 公釐; 窄口; 標準口; 寬口; 其他
it: Bocca di bottiglia compatibile: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Bocca stretta; Bocca standard; Bocca larga; Altro
cs: Kompatibilní hrdlo lahve: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Úzké hrdlo; Standardní hrdlo; Široké hrdlo; Ostatní
pt-PT: Gargalo de garrafa compatível: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Boca estreita; Boca padrão; Boca larga; Outro
sl-SI: Združljivo ustje steklenice: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Ozko grlo; Standardno grlo; Široko grlo; Drugo
nb: Kompatibel flaskemunn: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Smal åpning; Standard åpning; Vid åpning; Annet
nl: Compatibele flesopening: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Smalle opening; Standaardopening; Brede opening; Overige
pt-BR: Bocal de garrafa compatível: 42 mm; 48.5 mm; Boca estreita; Boca padrão; Boca larga; Outro
ru: Совместимое горлышко бутылки: 42 мм; 48,5 мм; Узкое горлышко; Стандартное горлышко; Широкое горлышко; Другое
sv: Kompatibel flasköppning: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Smal öppning; Standardöppning; Vid öppning; Övrigt
th: ปากขวดที่เข้ากันได้: 42 มม.; 48.5 มม.; ปากแคบ; ปากมาตรฐาน; ปากกว้าง; อื่นๆ
es: Boca de botella compatible: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Boca estrecha; Boca estándar; Boca ancha; Otro
de: Kompatibler Flaschenhals: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Enger Hals; Standardhals; Weiter Hals; Sonstige
tr: Uyumlu şişe ağzı: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Dar ağız; Standart ağız; Geniş ağız; Diğer
vi: Miệng chai tương thích: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Miệng hẹp; Miệng tiêu chuẩn; Miệng rộng; Khác
el: Συμβατό στόμιο μπουκαλιού: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Στενό στόμιο; Τυπικό στόμιο; Φαρδύ στόμιο; Άλλο
bg-BG: Съвместим тип гърло/отвор на бутилката: 42 mm; 48.5 mm; Тясно гърло; Стандартно гърло; Широко гърло; Друго
fr: Goulot de bouteille compatible: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Goulot étroit; Goulot standard; Goulot large; Autre
ko: 호환되는 병 입구: 42mm; 48.5mm; 내로우 마우스; 스탠다드 마우스; 와이드 마우스; 기타
da: Kompatibel flaskemunding: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Smal åbning; Standardåbning; Bred åbning; Andet
fi: Yhteensopiva pullon suuaukko: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Kapea suu; Vakiosuu; Leveä suu; Muu
en: Compatible bottle mouth: 42 mm; 48.5 mm; Narrow mouth; Standard mouth; Wide mouth; Other
zh-CN: 适配的瓶口: 42 毫米; 48.5 毫米; 窄口; 标准口; 宽口; 其他
hu: Kompatibilis palackszáj: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Szűk szájú; Normál szájú; Széles szájú; Egyéb
lt-LT: Suderinamas butelio kaklelio tipas: 42 mm; 48,5 mm; Siauras kakliukas; Standartinis kakliukas; Platus kakliukas; Kita